output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.aff
FLAG long
SFX DN Y 80
SFX DN ти л .
SFX DN ти ла .
SFX DN ти ло .
SFX DN ти ли .
SFX DN рати еру .
SFX DN рати ерем .
SFX DN рати ереш .
SFX DN рати ере .
SFX DN рати еремо .
SFX DN рати ерете .
SFX DN рати ерут .
SFX DN ти х .
SFX DN ти ше .
SFX DN ти хмо .
SFX DN ти сте .
SFX DN ти ху .
SFX DN рати ери .
SFX DN рати еримо .
SFX DN рати ерите .
SFX DN рати еручи .
SFX DN рати еручего .
SFX DN рати еручему .
SFX DN рати еручим .
SFX DN рати еручем .
SFX DN рати еручих .
SFX DN рати еручими .
SFX DN рати еруча .
SFX DN рати еручу .
SFX DN рати еручеј .
SFX DN рати еручеју .
SFX DN рати еруче .
SFX DN рати еремы .
SFX DN рати еремого .
SFX DN рати еремому .
SFX DN рати еремым .
SFX DN рати еремом .
SFX DN рати еремо .
SFX DN рати ерема .
SFX DN рати ерему .
SFX DN рати еремој .
SFX DN рати еремоју .
SFX DN рати ереми .
SFX DN рати ереме .
SFX DN рати еремых .
SFX DN рати еремым .
SFX DN рати еремыми .
SFX DN ти вши .
SFX DN ти вшего .
SFX DN ти вшему .
SFX DN ти вшим .
SFX DN ти вшем .
SFX DN ти вших .
SFX DN ти вшими .
SFX DN ти вша .
SFX DN ти вшу .
SFX DN ти вшеј .
SFX DN ти вшеју .
SFX DN ти вше .
SFX DN ти ны .
SFX DN ти ного .
SFX DN ти ному .
SFX DN ти ным .
SFX DN ти ном .
SFX DN ти ни .
SFX DN ти не .
SFX DN ти ных .
SFX DN ти ными .
SFX DN ти на .
SFX DN ти ну .
SFX DN ти ној .
SFX DN ти ноју .
SFX DN ти но .
SFX DN ти нје/xPxE .
SFX DN ти нја/xPxE .
SFX DN ти нју/xPxE .
SFX DN ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX DN ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX DN ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX DN ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX DN ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX DO Y 9
SFX DO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DO 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX DO ов ви/xPxE .
SFX DO ов ве/xPxE .
SFX DO ов виј/xPxE .
SFX DO ов вах/xPxE .
SFX DO ов вам/xPxE .
SFX DO 0 ју/xPxE .
SFX DO ов вами/xPxE .

SFX DP Y 80
SFX DP ти л .
SFX DP ти ла .
SFX DP ти ло .
SFX DP ти ли .
SFX DP ати ју .
SFX DP ати јем .
SFX DP ати јеш .
SFX DP ати је .
SFX DP ати јемо .
SFX DP ати јете .
SFX DP ати јут .
SFX DP ти х .
SFX DP ти ше .
SFX DP ти хмо .
SFX DP ти сте .
SFX DP ти ху .
SFX DP ати ј .
SFX DP ати јмо .
SFX DP ати јте .
SFX DP ати јучи .
SFX DP ати јучего .
SFX DP ати јучему .
SFX DP ати јучим .
SFX DP ати јучем .
SFX DP ати јучих .
SFX DP ати јучими .
SFX DP ати јуча .
SFX DP ати јучу .
SFX DP ати јучеј .
SFX DP ати јучеју .
SFX DP ати јуче .
SFX DP ати јемы .
SFX DP ати јемого .
SFX DP ати јемому .
SFX DP ати јемым .
SFX DP ати јемом .
SFX DP ати јемо .
SFX DP ати јема .
SFX DP ати јему .
SFX DP ати јемој .
SFX DP ати јемоју .
SFX DP ати јеми .
SFX DP ати јеме .
SFX DP ати јемых .
SFX DP ати јемым .
SFX DP ати јемыми .
SFX DP ти вши .
SFX DP ти вшего .
SFX DP ти вшему .
SFX DP ти вшим .
SFX DP ти вшем .
SFX DP ти вших .
SFX DP ти вшими .
SFX DP ти вша .
SFX DP ти вшу .
SFX DP ти вшеј .
SFX DP ти вшеју .
SFX DP ти вше .
SFX DP ти ны .
SFX DP ти ного .
SFX DP ти ному .
SFX DP ти ным .
SFX DP ти ном .
SFX DP ти ни .
SFX DP ти не .
SFX DP ти ных .
SFX DP ти ными .
SFX DP ти на .
SFX DP ти ну .
SFX DP ти ној .
SFX DP ти ноју .
SFX DP ти но .
SFX DP ти нје/xPxE .
SFX DP ти нја/xPxE .
SFX DP ти нју/xPxE .
SFX DP ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX DP ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX DP ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX DP ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX DP ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX DQ Y 15
SFX DQ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX DQ ош ш/xPxE .
SFX DQ ош ши/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 и/xPxE .
SFX DQ ош шиј/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 иј/xPxE .
SFX DQ ош шах/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX DQ ош шам/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX DQ ош шју/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 ју/xPxE .
SFX DQ ош шами/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX DR Y 9
SFX DR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DR о о/xPxBxO .
SFX DR о а/xPxE .
SFX DR но он/xPxE .
SFX DR о у/xPxE .
SFX DR о ах/xPxE .
SFX DR о ам/xPxE .
SFX DR 0 м/xPxE .
SFX DR о ами/xPxE .

SFX DS Y 80
SFX DS ти л .
SFX DS ти ла .
SFX DS ти ло .
SFX DS ти ли .
SFX DS вати ову .
SFX DS вати овем .
SFX DS вати овеш .
SFX DS вати ове .
SFX DS вати овемо .
SFX DS вати овете .
SFX DS вати овут .
SFX DS ти х .
SFX DS ти ше .
SFX DS ти хмо .
SFX DS ти сте .
SFX DS ти ху .
SFX DS вати ови .
SFX DS вати овимо .
SFX DS вати овите .
SFX DS вати овучи .
SFX DS вати овучего .
SFX DS вати овучему .
SFX DS вати овучим .
SFX DS вати овучем .
SFX DS вати овучих .
SFX DS вати овучими .
SFX DS вати овуча .
SFX DS вати овучу .
SFX DS вати овучеј .
SFX DS вати овучеју .
SFX DS вати овуче .
SFX DS вати овемы .
SFX DS вати овемого .
SFX DS вати овемому .
SFX DS вати овемым .
SFX DS вати овемом .
SFX DS вати овемо .
SFX DS вати овема .
SFX DS вати овему .
SFX DS вати овемој .
SFX DS вати овемоју .
SFX DS вати овеми .
SFX DS вати овеме .
SFX DS вати овемых .
SFX DS вати овемым .
SFX DS вати овемыми .
SFX DS ти вши .
SFX DS ти вшего .
SFX DS ти вшему .
SFX DS ти вшим .
SFX DS ти вшем .
SFX DS ти вших .
SFX DS ти вшими .
SFX DS ти вша .
SFX DS ти вшу .
SFX DS ти вшеј .
SFX DS ти вшеју .
SFX DS ти вше .
SFX DS ти ны .
SFX DS ти ного .
SFX DS ти ному .
SFX DS ти ным .
SFX DS ти ном .
SFX DS ти ни .
SFX DS ти не .
SFX DS ти ных .
SFX DS ти ными .
SFX DS ти на .
SFX DS ти ну .
SFX DS ти ној .
SFX DS ти ноју .
SFX DS ти но .
SFX DS ти нје/xPxE .
SFX DS ти нја/xPxE .
SFX DS ти нју/xPxE .
SFX DS ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX DS ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX DS ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX DS ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX DS ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX DT Y 68
SFX DT ти л .
SFX DT ти ла .
SFX DT ти ло .
SFX DT ти ли .
SFX DT тєти чу .
SFX DT єти им .
SFX DT єти иш .
SFX DT єти и .
SFX DT єти имо .
SFX DT єти ите .
SFX DT єти ет .
SFX DT ти х .
SFX DT ти ше .
SFX DT ти хмо .
SFX DT ти сте .
SFX DT ти ху .
SFX DT єти ечи .
SFX DT єти еча .
SFX DT єти ече .
SFX DT єти имы .
SFX DT єти имого .
SFX DT єти имому .
SFX DT єти имым .
SFX DT єти имом .
SFX DT єти имо .
SFX DT єти има .
SFX DT єти иму .
SFX DT єти имој .
SFX DT єти имоју .
SFX DT єти ими .
SFX DT єти име .
SFX DT єти имых .
SFX DT єти имым .
SFX DT єти имыми .
SFX DT ти вши .
SFX DT ти вшего .
SFX DT ти вшему .
SFX DT ти вшим .
SFX DT ти вшем .
SFX DT ти вших .
SFX DT ти вшими .
SFX DT ти вша .
SFX DT ти вшу .
SFX DT ти вшеј .
SFX DT ти вшеју .
SFX DT ти вше .
SFX DT ти ны .
SFX DT ти ного .
SFX DT ти ному .
SFX DT ти ным .
SFX DT ти ном .
SFX DT ти ни .
SFX DT ти не .
SFX DT ти ных .
SFX DT ти ными .
SFX DT ти на .
SFX DT ти ну .
SFX DT ти ној .
SFX DT ти ноју .
SFX DT ти но .
SFX DT ти нје/xPxE .
SFX DT ти нја/xPxE .
SFX DT ти нју/xPxE .
SFX DT ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX DT ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX DT ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX DT ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX DT ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX DU Y 21
SFX DU 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX DU он н/xPxE .
SFX DU он ны/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX DU он на/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 а/xPxE .
SFX DU он нов/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX DU он ну/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 у/xPxE .
SFX DU он нах/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX DU он нам/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX DU он ном/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX DU он нами/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX DU он не/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 е/xPxE .

SFX DV Y 65
SFX DV ти у .
SFX DV ти ем .
SFX DV ти еш .
SFX DV ти е .
SFX DV ти емо .
SFX DV ти ете .
SFX DV ти ут .
SFX DV ти ех .
SFX DV ти еше .
SFX DV ти ехмо .
SFX DV ти есте .
SFX DV ти еху .
SFX DV ти и .
SFX DV ти имо .
SFX DV ти ите .
SFX DV ти учи .
SFX DV ти учего .
SFX DV ти учему .
SFX DV ти учим .
SFX DV ти учем .
SFX DV ти учих .
SFX DV ти учими .
SFX DV ти уча .
SFX DV ти учу .
SFX DV ти учеј .
SFX DV ти учеју .
SFX DV ти уче .
SFX DV ти омы .
SFX DV ти омого .
SFX DV ти омому .
SFX DV ти омым .
SFX DV ти омом .
SFX DV ти омо .
SFX DV ти ома .
SFX DV ти ому .
SFX DV ти омој .
SFX DV ти омоју .
SFX DV ти оми .
SFX DV ти оме .
SFX DV ти омых .
SFX DV ти омым .
SFX DV ти омыми .
SFX DV ти омо .
SFX DV ти ены .
SFX DV ти еного .
SFX DV ти еному .
SFX DV ти еным .
SFX DV ти еном .
SFX DV ти ени .
SFX DV ти ене .
SFX DV ти еных .
SFX DV ти еными .
SFX DV ти ена .
SFX DV ти ену .
SFX DV ти еној .
SFX DV ти еноју .
SFX DV ти ено .
SFX DV ти енје/xPxE .
SFX DV ти енја/xPxE .
SFX DV ти енју/xPxE .
SFX DV ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX DV ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX DV ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX DV ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX DV ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX DW Y 5
SFX DW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DW 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX DW 0 а/xPxE .
SFX DW 0 у/xPxE .
SFX DW 0 ем/xPxE .
