output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
брати/DN
кров/DO
послати/DP
вош/DQ
окно/DR
звати/DS
одлетєти/DT
сон/DU
идти/DV
јануар/DW
февруар/DW
бров/DO
влакно/DR
назвати/DS
полетєти/DT
позвати/DS
потєти/DT
избрати/DN
лјубов/DO
созвати/DS
улетєти/DT
возлетєти/DT
иззвати/DS
изслати/DP
прєзвати/DS
разбрати/DN
чловєчност/DW
црков/DO
набрати/DN
летєти/DT
одбрати/DN
призвати/DS
слати/DP
вртєти/DT
забрати/DN
свекров/DO
јатров/DO
облетєти/DT
одслати/DP
одзвати/DS
разлетєти/DT
разслати/DP
прати/DN
изпрати/DN
прислати/DP
подбрати/DN
